Delaware, session 153, HB87.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 6201, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 6201. The Delaware Suicide Prevention Coalition; mission, composition, organization, and reporting. (c) The Coalition shall consist of the following members: (1) One representative of the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health, to be appointed by the Secretary of the Department of Health and Social Services; (2) One representative of the Division of Prevention and Behavioral Health Services, to be appointed by the Secretary of the Department of Services for Children, Youth and their Families; (3) One representative of the Division of Public Health, to be appointed by the Secretary of the Department of Health and Social Services; (4) One representative of the Department of Correction, to be appointed by the Commissioner of the department; (5) One representative of the Department of Education, to be appointed by the Secretary of the department; (6) One representative of the Delaware Commission of Veterans Affairs, to be appointed by the Chairman of the Commission; (7) One representative of the Delaware National Guard, to be appointed by the Adjutant General; (8) One representative of the Mental Health Association of Delaware, to be appointed by the Executive Director; (9) One representative of a private psychiatric facility, appointed by the Governor; (10) One representative to be appointed by the Governor. Governor; (11) One representative who has experienced suicide ideation or survived a suicide attempt, appointed by the Governor; (12) One representative who has lost a loved one to suicide, appointed by the Governor.